District of Columbia statutes.
22-2723

Property subject to seizure and forfeiture.

(a)

The following are subject to forfeiture:

(1)

All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles or vessels, which are used, or intended for use, to transport, or in any manner to facilitate a violation of a prostitution-related offense; and

(2)

All money, coins, and currency which are used, or intended for use, in violation of a prostitution-related offense.

(b)

All seizures and forfeitures of property under this section shall be pursuant to the standards and procedures set forth in D.C. Law 20-278.

Aug. 15, 1935, 49 Stat. 651, ch. 546, § 5
as added May 7, 1993, D.C. Law 9-267, § 2, 39 DCR 5684
May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-130, § 3(c), 43 DCR 1570
October 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 403(a), 47 DCR 4619
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 211(b), 53 DCR 8610
June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-278, § 306, 62 DCR 1920
D.C. Law 20-278, referred to in (b), enacted Chapter 3 of Title 41 (§ 41-301 et seq.), made amendments to the criminal offenses in §§ 48-901.02 and 48-905.02, and made conforming amendments to §§ 7-2507.06a, 8-905, 22-902, 22-1705, 22-2723, 32-1343, 48-905.03, and 50-1501.04.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 211(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 211(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 211(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 211(b) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3 of the Safe Streets Anti-Prostitution Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-133, August 11, 1995, 42 DCR 4680) and see § 3 of the Safe Streets Anti-Prostitution Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-153, November 9, 1995, 42 DCR 6567).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-278 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 16-306, in pars. (1) and (2) of subsec. (a), substituted “a violation of a prostitution-related offense” for “a violation of this act”.
“All seizures and forfeitures of property under this section shall be pursuant to § 33-552 [1981 Ed.].”
D.C. Law 13-160 rewrote subsec. (b), which had read:
1981 Ed., § 22-2723.
This section is referenced in § 22-2701.01, § 22-2725, § 22-2731, § 22-4001, § 42-3101, and § 47-2844.